Vermont, session 2025-2026, H105.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 7 V.S.A. § 656 is amended to read:
§ 656. PERSON 16 12 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER AND UNDER 21
YEARS OF AGE MISREPRESENTING AGE, PROCURING,
POSSESSING, OR CONSUMING ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES;
IMPAIRED DRIVING; POSSESSION OF CANNABIS; CIVIL
VIOLATION
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Alcohol” has the same meaning as in 23 V.S.A. § 1200(4).
(2) “Alcohol concentration” has the same meaning as in 23 V.S.A.
§ 1200(1).
(3) “Cannabis” has the same meaning as in subdivision 831(2) of this
title.
(4) “Highway” has the same meaning as in 23 V.S.A. § 1200(7).
(5) “Ignition interlock device” has the same meaning as in 23 V.S.A.
§ 1200(8).
(6) “Ignition interlock restricted driver’s license,” “ignition interlock
RDL” or “RDL,” and “ignition interlock certificate” have the same meaning as
in 23 V.S.A. § 1200(9).
VT LEG #384185 v.1

No. 45 Page 2 of 16
2025
(7) “Law enforcement officer” has the same meaning as “enforcement
officer” as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4(11)(A).
(8) “License to operate a motor vehicle” has the same meaning as in 23
V.S.A. § 4(48).
(9) “Motor vehicle” or “vehicle” has the same meaning as “motor
vehicle” as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4(21).
(10) “Operate or attempts to operate” has the same meaning as in 23
V.S.A. § 4(24).
(11) “Operator” has the same meaning as in 23 V.S.A. § 4(25) and shall
include “junior operator” as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4(16).
(12) “Person” has the same meaning as in 23 V.S.A. § 4(27).
(13) “Privilege to operate” has the same meaning as in 23 V.S.A.
§ 4(58).
(14) “Suspension” or “suspension of the person’s operator’s license” has
the same meaning as “suspension of license” as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4(50).
(b) Prohibited conduct; offense offenses.
(1) Prohibited conduct. A person 16 12 years of age or older and under
21 years of age shall not:
(A) Falsely represent the person’s age for the purpose of procuring or
attempting to procure malt or vinous beverages, ready-to-drink spirits
beverages, spirits, or fortified wines from any licensee, State liquor agency, or
other person or persons.
VT LEG #384185 v.1

No. 45 Page 3 of 16
2025
(B) Possess malt or vinous beverages, ready-to-drink spirits
beverages, spirits, or fortified wines for the purpose of consumption by the
person or other minors, except in the regular performance of duties as an
employee of a licensee licensed to sell alcoholic liquor.
(C) Knowingly and unlawfully possess one ounce or less of cannabis
or five grams or less of hashish or two mature cannabis plants or fewer or four
immature cannabis plants or fewer.
(D) Consume malt or vinous beverages, ready-to-drink spirits
beverages, spirits, or fortified wines. A violation of this subdivision may be
prosecuted in a jurisdiction where the minor person has consumed malt or
vinous beverages, ready-to-drink spirits beverages, spirits, or fortified wines or
in a jurisdiction where the indicators of consumption are observed.
(E) Operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control on a
highway of a vehicle when the person’s blood alcohol concentration is 0.02 or
more.
(2) Offense Procurement, possession, or consumption penalties. A
person who knowingly violates subdivision any of subdivisions (1)(A)–(D) of
this subsection commits a civil violation and shall be referred to the Court
Diversion Program for the purpose of enrollment in the Youth Substance
Awareness Safety Program. A person who fails to complete the program
successfully commits a civil violation under the jurisdiction of the Judicial
Bureau and shall be subject to the following:
VT LEG #384185 v.1

No. 45 Page 4 of 16
2025
(A) a civil penalty of $300.00 and suspension of the person’s
operator’s license and privilege to operate a motor vehicle for a period of 30
days, for a first offense; and
(B) a civil penalty of not more than $600.00 and suspension of the
person’s operator’s license and privilege to operate a motor vehicle for a
period of 90 days, for a second or subsequent offense.
(3) Impaired driver penalties.
(A) A person who violates subdivision (1)(E) of this subsection (b)
commits a civil violation, shall be referred to the Court Diversion Program for
the purpose of enrollment in the Youth Substance Awareness Safety Program,
and the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall suspend the person’s operator’s
license and privilege to operate a motor vehicle in accordance with subdivision
(B) of this subdivision (b)(3). A person who fails to complete the Program
successfully commits a civil violation under the jurisdiction of the Judicial
Bureau and shall be subject to the following:
(i) For a first offense, a civil penalty of $300.00 and suspension of
the person’s operator’s license and privilege to operate a motor vehicle for a
period of 180 days and compliance with the requirements of 23 V.S.A.
§ 1209a(a)(1).
(ii) For a second or subsequent offense, a civil penalty of $600.00
and suspension of the person’s operator’s license for a period of one year or
VT LEG #384185 v.1

No. 45 Page 5 of 16
2025
until the person reaches 21 years of age, whichever is longer, and compliance
with the requirements of 23 V.S.A. § 1209a(a)(2).
(iii) A person who violates subdivision (1)(E) of this subsection
(b) may also be subject to recall of the person’s provisional license under
23 V.S.A. § 607a.
(iv) If a law enforcement officer has reasonable grounds to believe
that a person is violating subdivision (1)(E) of this subsection (b), the officer
may request the person to submit to a breath test using a preliminary screening
device approved by the Commissioner of Public Safety. A refusal to submit to
the breath test shall be considered a violation of subdivision (1)(E) of this
subsection (b). Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in 23 V.S.A.
§§ 1202 and 1203:
(I) the results of the test shall be admissible evidence in a
proceeding under this section; and
(II) there shall be no statutory right to counsel prior to the
administration of the test.
(v) In a proceeding under this section, if there was at any time
within two hours after operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual
physical control of a vehicle on a highway a blood alcohol concentration of
0.02 or more, it shall be a rebuttable presumption that the person’s blood
alcohol concentration was 0.02 or more at the time of operating, attempting to
operate, or being in actual physical control.
VT LEG #384185 v.1

No. 45 Page 6 of 16
2025
(vi) No points shall be assessed for a violation of subdivision
(1)(E) of this subsection (b).
(vii) The Alcohol and Driving Program required under this section
shall be administered by the Department of Health’s Division of Substance Use
Programs and shall take into consideration any particular treatment needs of
operators under 21 years of age.
(viii) An alleged violation of this section shall not bar prosecution
for any crime, including a prosecution under 23 V.S.A. § 1201.
(ix) Suspensions imposed under this subdivision (3)(A) or any
comparable statute of any other jurisdiction shall run concurrently with
suspensions imposed under 23 V.S.A. §§ 1205, 1206, and 1208 or any
comparable statutes of any other jurisdiction or with any suspension resulting
from a conviction for a violation of 23 V.S.A. § 1091 from the same incident.
(B)(i) For a first offense, a person shall serve suspension of the
person’s operator’s license and privilege to operate a motor vehicle for a
period of 90 days and shall be automatically reinstated after the 90-day period.
(ii) For a second or subsequent offense, a person shall serve a
suspension of the person’s operator’s license and privilege to operate a motor
vehicle for a period 145 days and shall be automatically reinstated after the
145-day period.
VT LEG #384185 v.1

No. 45 Page 7 of 16
2025
(iii) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall issue a notice of
reinstatement to the person serving a suspension under this subdivision
(b)(3)(B) upon successful completion of the suspension.
(iv) If a person fails to complete the Youth Substance Awareness
Safety Program, the person shall receive credit for any elapsed period of a
suspension served pursuant to this subdivision (b)(3)(B) against any
suspension imposed pursuant to subdivision (A) of this subdivision (b)(3).
(C) During a suspension issued pursuant to subdivision (A) or (B) of
this subdivision (3), a person may operate a motor vehicle if issued an ignition
interlock restricted driver’s license or certificate in accordance with 23 V.S.A.
§ 1213.
(i) A person subject to penalties under subdivision (A)(i) of this
subdivision (b)(3) and who elects to operate a motor vehicle with an ignition
interlock RDL or certificate shall be reinstated only if the person operates with
an ignition interlock RDL or certificate for a period of 180 days, in addition to
any extension of this period arising from a violation of 23 V.S.A. § 1213.
(ii) A person subject to penalties under subdivision (A)(i) of this
subdivision (b)(3) and who elects to operate a motor vehicle with an ignition
interlock RDL or certificate shall be reinstated only if the person operates with
an ignition interlock RDL or certificate for a period of one year or until the
person reaches 21 years of age, whichever is longer, in addition to any
extension of this period arising from a violation of 23 V.S.A. § 1213.
VT LEG #384185 v.1

No. 45 Page 8 of 16
2025
(b)(c) Issuance of notice of violation. A law enforcement officer shall issue
a person who violates this section a notice of violation, in a form approved by
the Court Administrator. A person shall not be cited for more than one
violation of subsection (b) of this section arising out of the same incident. The
notice of violation shall require the person to provide the person’s name and
address, shall indicate the presence of any substances that constitute a violation
of subsection (b) of this section, and shall explain procedures under this
section, including that:
(1) the person shall contact the Diversion Program in the county where
the offense occurred within 15 days;
(2) failure to contact the Diversion Program within 15 days will result in
the case being referred to the Judicial Bureau, where the person, if found liable
for the violation, will be subject to a civil penalty and a suspension of the
person’s operator’s license and may face substantially increased insurance
rates;
(3) no money should be submitted to pay any penalty until after
adjudication; and
(4) the person shall notify the Diversion Program if the person’s address
changes.
(d) Issuance of Notice of Suspension.
(1) On behalf of the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, a law
enforcement officer issuing a notice of violation in accordance with subsection
VT LEG #384185 v.1

No. 45 Page 9 of 16
2025
(c) of this section shall also serve a notice of suspension of the person’s
operator’s license and privilege to operate a motor vehicle in a form prescribed
by the Court Administrator. The form shall include the following:
(A) the effective date of the suspension;
(B) the suspension’s duration;
(C) an explanation of the consequences of the suspension;
(D) the option to operate a motor vehicle with an ignition interlock
restricted driver’s license or certificate in accordance with 23 V.S.A. § 1213;
(E) the projected date of reinstatement upon successful completion of
the suspension; and
(F) the ability to review the imposition of the suspension pursuant to
Rule 75 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure.
(2) A suspension issued pursuant to subdivision (b)(3)(B) of this section
shall become effective on the 11th day after the person receives notice in
accordance with this subsection.
(3) A copy of the notice of suspension shall be sent to the Commissioner
of Motor Vehicles.
(c)(e) Summons and complaint. When a person is issued a notice of
violation under this section, the law enforcement officer shall complete a
summons and complaint for the offense and send it to the Diversion Program
in the county where the offense occurred. The summons and complaint shall
not be filed with the Judicial Bureau at that time.
VT LEG #384185 v.1

No. 45 Page 10 of 16
2025
(d)(f) Registration in Youth Substance Abuse Safety Program. Within 15
days after receiving a notice of violation, the person shall contact the Diversion
Program in the county where the offense occurred and register for the Youth
Substance Abuse Safety Program. If the person fails to do so, the Diversion
Program shall file the summons and complaint with the Judicial Bureau for
adjudication under 4 V.S.A. chapter 29. The Diversion Program shall provide
a copy of the summons and complaint to the law enforcement officer who
issued the notice of violation and shall provide two copies to the person
charged with subject to the violation.
(e)(g) Notice to report to Diversion. Upon receipt from a law enforcement
officer of a summons and complaint completed under this section, the
Diversion Program shall send the person a notice to report to the Diversion
Program. The notice to report shall provide that:
(1) The person is required to complete all conditions related to the
offense imposed by the Diversion Program, including substance abuse
screening and, if deemed appropriate following the screening, substance abuse
assessment or substance abuse counseling, or both.
(2) If the person does not satisfactorily complete the substance abuse
screening, any required substance abuse assessment or substance abuse
counseling, or any other condition related to the offense imposed by the
Diversion Program, the case will be referred to the Judicial Bureau, where the
person, if found liable for the violation, shall be assessed a civil penalty, the
VT LEG #384185 v.1

No. 45 Page 11 of 16
2025
person’s driver’s license will be suspended, and the person’s automobile
insurance rates may increase substantially.
(3) If the person satisfactorily completes the substance abuse screening,
any required substance abuse assessment or substance abuse counseling, and
any other condition related to the offense imposed by the Diversion Program,
no penalty shall be imposed and the person’s operator’s license shall not be
suspended.
(f)(h) Diversion Program requirements.
(1) Upon being contacted by a person who has been issued a notice of
violation, the Diversion Program shall register the person in the Youth
Substance Abuse Safety Program. Pursuant to the Youth Substance Abuse
Safety Program, the Diversion Program shall impose conditions on the person.
The conditions imposed shall include only conditions related to the offense and
in every case shall include a condition requiring satisfactory completion of
substance abuse screening using an evidence-based tool and, if deemed
appropriate following the screening, substance abuse assessment and substance
abuse education or substance abuse counseling, or both. If the screener
recommends substance abuse counseling, the person shall choose a State-
certified or State-licensed substance abuse counselor or substance abuse
treatment provider to provide the services.
(2) Substance abuse screening required under this subsection shall be
completed within 60 days after the Diversion Program receives a summons and
VT LEG #384185 v.1

No. 45 Page 12 of 16
2025
complaint. The person shall complete all conditions at the person’s own
expense.
(3) When a person has satisfactorily completed substance abuse
screening, any required substance abuse education or substance abuse
counseling, and any other condition related to the offense that the Diversion
Program has imposed, the Diversion Program shall:
(A) Void the summons and complaint with no penalty due.
(B) Send copies of the voided summons and complaint to the Judicial
Bureau and to the law enforcement officer who completed them. Before
sending copies of the voided summons and complaint to the Judicial Bureau
under this subdivision, the Diversion Program shall redact all language
containing the person’s name, address, Social Security number, and any other
information that identifies the person.
(4) If a person does not satisfactorily complete substance abuse
screening, any required substance abuse education or substance abuse
counseling, or any other condition related to the offense imposed by the
Diversion Program, the Diversion Program shall file the summons and
complaint with the Judicial Bureau for adjudication under 4 V.S.A. chapter 29.
The Diversion Program shall provide a copy of the summons and complaint to
the law enforcement officer who issued the notice of violation and shall
provide two copies to the person charged with the violation.
VT LEG #384185 v.1

No. 45 Page 13 of 16
2025
(5)(A) A person aggrieved by a decision of the Diversion Program or
alcohol counselor may seek review of that decision pursuant to Rule 75 of the
Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure.
(B) Prior to the filing of the complaint with the Judicial Bureau in
accordance with this section, a person aggrieved by a suspension imposed
under subdivision (b)(3)(B) of this section may seek review of that imposition
pursuant to Rule 75 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure.
(6) Notwithstanding 3 V.S.A. §§ 163(a)(2)(C) and 164 (a)(2)(C) any law
to the contrary, the adult or juvenile diversion programs shall accept cases
from the Youth Substance Awareness Safety Program pursuant to this section.
The confidentiality provisions of 3 V.S.A. § 163 or 164 shall become effective
when a notice of violation is issued pursuant to subsection (b)(c) of this section
and shall remain in effect unless the person fails to register with or complete
the Youth Substance Awareness Safety Program.
(g) [Repealed.]
(h)(i) Record of adjudications; confidentiality; public records exemption.
(1) Upon adjudicating a person in violation of this section, the Judicial
Bureau shall notify the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, who shall maintain a
record of all such adjudications that shall be separate from the registry
maintained by the Department for motor vehicle driving records. The identity
of a person in the registry shall be revealed only to the following:
VT LEG #384185 v.1

No. 45 Page 14 of 16
2025
(A) a law enforcement officer determining whether the person has
previously violated this section; or
(B) an insurance company or its third-party contractor only for the
purposes of recording a license suspension issued pursuant to subdivision
(b)(3) of this section.
(2) Except as provided in this subsection:
(A) All information related to a suspension issued pursuant to
subdivision (b)(3) of this section shall be held strictly confidential and not
released without the participant’s prior consent.
(B) Any records or information produced or acquired pursuant to a
suspension issued pursuant to subdivision (b)(3) of this section shall be exempt
from public inspection or copying under Vermont’s Public Records Act.
(j) Reporting. Annually, beginning on October 1, 2026, the Office of the
Attorney General, and other entities as needed, shall submit a written report to
the House and Senate Committees on Judiciary related to impaired driver
violations under this section, containing the following, if available:
(1) the number of persons referred to the Youth Substance Awareness
Safety Program;
(2) the ages of the persons referred to the Program;
(3) the number of persons who successfully complete the Program;
(4) the number of persons who fail the Program; and
VT LEG #384185 v.1

No. 45 Page 15 of 16
2025
(5) the number of persons who serve suspensions imposed by the
Judicial Bureau after failing the Program.
Sec. 2. IMPAIRED DRIVING; OUTCOME MEASURES; REPORT
For the first report submitted pursuant to 7 V.S.A. § 656(j), the Office of the
Attorney General, in collaboration with the Vermont Statistical Analysis
Center and others as needed, shall propose outcome measures to assess the
effectiveness of any suspensions imposed for impaired driver violations and
the Youth Substance Awareness Safety Program as a whole.
Sec. 3. 23 V.S.A. § 1209a(a) is amended to read:
(a) Conditions of reinstatement. No license or privilege to operate
suspended or revoked under this subchapter, except a license or privilege to
operate suspended under section 1216 of this title, shall be reinstated except as
follows:
* * *
Sec. 4. REPEALS
(a) 7 V.S.A. § 657a (person under 16 years of age misrepresenting age or
procuring or possessing alcoholic beverages; delinquency) is repealed.
(b) 18 V.S.A. § 4230b (cannabis possession by a person 16 years of age or
older and under 21 years of age; civil violation) is repealed.
(c) 18 V.S.A. § 4230j (cannabis possession by a person under 16 years of
age; delinquency) is repealed.
VT LEG #384185 v.1

No. 45 Page 16 of 16
2025
(d) 23 V.S.A. § 1216 (persons under 21 years of age; alcohol concentration
of 0.02 or more) is repealed.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
Date Governor signed bill: June 5, 2025
VT LEG #384185 v.1